Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB661.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 189.540 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations to
govern the design and operation of all Kentucky school buses and to govern the
operation of [district-owned ]passenger vehicles owned, leased, or privately
contracted by the district that transport[transporting] students under KRS
156.153(3)[(2)]. The board shall, with the advice and aid of the Department of
Kentucky State Police and the Transportation Cabinet, enforce the administrative
regulations governing the operation of all school buses whether owned by a school
district or privately contracted and all [district-owned ]passenger vehicles owned,
leased, or privately contracted by the district that transport[transporting] students
under KRS 156.153(3)[(2)]. The regulations covering the operation shall by
reference be made a part of any contract with a school district. Every school district
and private contractor referred to under this subsection shall be subject to those
regulations.
(2) Any employee of any school district who violates any of the administrative
regulations in any contract executed on behalf of a school district shall be subject to
removal from office. Any person operating a school bus or passenger vehicle to
transport students under contract with a school district who fails to comply with
any of the administrative regulations shall be guilty of breach of contract and the
contract shall be canceled after proper notice and a hearing by the responsible
officers of such school district.
(3) (a) Any person who operates a school bus shall be required to possess a
commercial driver's license issued pursuant to KRS 281A.170 with a school
bus endorsement as described in KRS 281A.175.
(b) Any person who operates a passenger vehicle that is owned, leased, or
Page 1 of 2
BR158000.100 - 1580 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:48 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1580
privately contracted by the district to transport students shall be required to
possess a valid Class D operator's license in accordance with KRS
156.153(3)(c).
Section 2. Whereas achieving efficiency in pupil transportation in the
Commonwealth is of paramount importance to schools, students, and parents, an
emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by
the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Page 2 of 2
BR158000.100 - 1580 - XXXX 3/6/2025 3:48 PM Jacketed